Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 64. Regional Economic Development

§ 57-64-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Regional Economic Development Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-3.
Declaration of public policy.

It is hereby declared that the state’s public welfare demands, and the state’s public policy requires:

That for the benefit of the people of the State of Mississippi, it is essential to foster and promote the issuing of bonds by local government units jointly or severally, including any joint bond issuance with a county, parish or other foreign political subdivision in another state.

That the bonds to be issued pursuant to this chapter shall be of any type permissible to be issued by any local government unit without limitation.

That the purposes of the bonds issued under this chapter are for acquiring land and/or acquiring or constructing buildings, fixtures, machinery, equipment, infrastructure, utilities, port or airport facilities, roads, railroad spurs and other related projects that have or will provide a multijurisdictional benefit.

That the projects contemplated under this chapter are to provide economic development benefits, including but not limited to, industry, distribution, commerce, tourism, healthcare and other purposes in which the public purpose and interest of the people of the state is served.

That costs and revenues connected with a project should both be shared by the members of the alliance created pursuant to this chapter.

That the authority granted under this chapter and the purposes to be accomplished hereby are proper governmental and public purposes and that the resulting economic benefits to the state are of paramount importance, mandating that the provisions of this chapter be liberally construed and applied in order to advance the public purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 6; Laws, 2017, ch. 337, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 57-64-5.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to permit local government units of the state to make the most efficient use of their powers and resources by enabling them to cooperate and to contract with other local government units, including foreign governmental units from another state, on a basis of mutual advantage, to share the costs of and revenues derived from a project, and to pledge revenue from a project to secure payment of the bonds issued for the project, and thereby provide services and facilities in a manner pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population and other factors influencing the needs and economic development of the local government units.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-7.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall be defined as herein provided unless the context requires otherwise:

“Alliance” means a regional economic development alliance created under this chapter.

“Bond” or “bonds” means bonds, notes or other evidence of indebtedness of the local government unit issued pursuant to this chapter.

“Cost of project” means all costs of site preparation and other start-up costs; all costs of construction; all costs of fixtures and of real and personal property required for the purposes of the project and facilities related thereto, whether publicly or privately owned, including land and any rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and all machinery and equipment, including motor vehicles which are used for project functions; and including any cost associated with the closure, post-closure maintenance or corrective action on environmental matters, financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the alliance may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of the project in operation; costs of engineering, surveying, environmental geotechnical, architectural and legal services; costs of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized in this chapter. The costs of any project may also include funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, bond insurance and credit enhancement, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the alliance for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the costs of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of user fees, of revenue bonds or notes issued under this chapter for such project, or from other revenues obtained by the alliance.

“County” means any county of this state.

“Foreign governmental unit” means any county, parish, city, town, village, utility district, school district, any community college, any institution of higher learning, any municipal airport authority, regional airport authority, port authority or any other political subdivision of another state.

“Governing body” means the board of supervisors of any county or the governing board of any city, town or village, the governing body of any utility district, the governing body of any school district or community college, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the governing body of any municipal or regional airport authority, the governing body of any port authority, or the governing body of any other political subdivision of the state. As to the state, the term governing body means the State Bond Commission.

“Holder of bonds” or “bondholder” or any similar term means any person who shall be the registered owner of any such bond or bonds which shall at the time be registered.

“Law” means any act or statute, general, special or local, of this state.

“Local government unit” means any county or incorporated city, town or village in the state, any school district, any utility district, any community college, any institution of higher learning, any municipal airport authority, any regional airport authority, any port authority or any other political subdivision of the state acting jointly or severally.

“MDA” means the Mississippi Development Authority.

“Municipality” means any incorporated municipality in the state.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, association, corporation, business trust or other business entity.

“Project” means and includes any of the following which promotes economic development or which assists in the creation of jobs, whether publicly or privately owned:

Acquisition, construction, repair, renovation, demolition or removal of:

1. Buildings and site improvements (including fixtures);

2. Potable and nonpotable water supply systems;

3. Sewage and waste disposal systems;

4. Storm water drainage and other drainage systems;

5. Airport facilities;

6. Rail lines and rail spurs;

7. Port facilities;

8. Highways, streets and other roadways;

9. Fire suppression and prevention systems;

10. Utility distribution systems, including, but not limited to, water, electricity, natural gas, telephone and other information and telecommunications facilities, whether by wire, fiber or wireless means; provided, however, that electrical, natural gas, telephone and telecommunication systems shall be constructed, repaired or renovated only for the purpose of completing the project and connecting to existing utility systems (this provision shall not be construed to prevent a city, county or natural gas district from supplying utility service that it is authorized to supply in the service area that it is authorized to serve);

11. Business, industrial and technology parks and the acquisition of land and acquisition or construction of improvements to land connected with any of the preceding purposes;

County purposes authorized by or defined in Sections 17-5-3 and 19-9-1, (except Section 19-9-1(f));

Municipal purposes authorized by or defined in Sections 17-5-3, 17-17-301 et seq., 21-27-23 and 21-33-301;

Refunding of bonds as authorized in Section 21-27-1 et seq.; and

A project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f) (i) or a facility related to the project as defined in Section 57-75-5(d), or both.

“Resolution” means a resolution, ordinance, act, record of minutes or other appropriate enactment of a governing body.

“Revenues” mean any and all taxes, fees, rates, rentals, profits and receipts collected by, payable to, or otherwise derived by, the local government units and foreign governmental units, and all other monies and income of whatsoever kind or character collected by, payable to, or otherwise derived by, the local government unit and foreign governmental units in connection with the economic development projects provided through this chapter.

“Security” means a bond, note or other evidence of indebtedness issued by a local government unit pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 538, § 17; Laws, 2017, ch. 337, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 57-64-9.
Certificate of public convenience and necessity.

Prior to issuing bonds to finance any proposed project under this chapter, the local government unit shall submit an application to the MDA for a certificate of public convenience and necessity. The application shall be in such form and content as the MDA shall from time to time prescribe.

The MDA shall investigate, find and determine, upon application of any local government unit therefor, as to whether a certificate of public convenience and necessity shall be issued to such local government unit to authorize creation of an alliance. The MDA is authorized and empowered, having due regard to the promotion of the public policy and the general welfare herein declared, to issue or refuse to issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the alliance to the local government unit. The MDA shall issue or refuse to issue the certificate of public convenience and necessity within six (6) months after it receives such application. If and when such certificate is issued, it shall authorize the particular local government unit to create and operate the alliance but, except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the certificate shall expire twelve (12) months from its date unless within that time such alliance shall have been created. Any application rejected may be resubmitted.

If and when a certificate is issued, the MDA therein shall fix and determine:

The extent and amount to which the local government unit may issue bonds or make expenditures for such alliance;

The extent and amount that the revenues derived from the project shall be shared by the local government unit with other members of the alliance;

The extent and amount that the revenues derived from the project may be pledged to secure payment of the bonds issued to finance the project;

What property may be acquired therefor;

The terms upon which such acquisition may be had;

What expenditures may be made; and

The construction of buildings and of equipment with its installation.

If the governing body of the local government unit fails or refuses to follow the requirements made by the MDA in the certificate, then the members of the governing body of the local government unit voting for such failure or refusal shall be individually and personally liable until they have been out of office for one (1) year, and liable upon their official bonds for any loss that the local government unit may sustain by reason of such failure or refusal to follow the requirements, and in addition may be compelled by injunction to comply with such requirements.

As an alternative to the procedure provided in subsection (1) of this section, local governmental units desiring to create an alliance may initially apply to the MDA for the creation of an alliance without identifying or providing details about a specific project for which the local governmental units desire to create an alliance. Upon receipt of such an application, the MDA shall review the application and determine whether it is appropriate for the issuance of an initial certificate of public convenience and necessity to the local government units authorizing the creation of an alliance. If the MDA determines the application for the creation of an alliance is appropriate, the MDA shall issue an initial certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing the creation of an alliance and authorizing the expenditure of funds by the alliance. An alliance created under this subsection (4) may make a subsequent application to the MDA identifying and providing details about a specific project or projects along with the methods of financing or amounts required for each project as provided under subsection (3) of this section. Upon receipt of such an application, the MDA shall review the application and determine whether it is appropriate for the issuance of a subsequent certificate of public convenience and necessity. If the MDA determines the application for a subsequent certificate of public convenience and necessity is appropriate, the MDA shall issue a subsequent certificate of public convenience and necessity authorizing and approving the project including the items provided in subsection (3) of this section.

A certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under this subsection (4) shall not expire until the local governmental units comprising the alliance terminate and dissolve the alliance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 9; Laws, 2003, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2003.).

§ 57-64-11.
Issuance of bonds.

After receiving a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the MDA, the local government unit is empowered and authorized, from time to time, to issue bonds up to the maximum principal amount authorized in the certificate.

After receiving a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the MDA, the governing body of any local government unit entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may incur bonded and floating indebtedness by issuing general obligation bonds, revenue bonds or special assessment bonds as authorized by any statute authorizing the issuance of such bonds,, and otherwise incur indebtedness in any manner for which the local government unit is authorized by statute to incur debt, and may appropriate funds for the purposes and in the manner prescribed by law without regard to whether the activities and improvements authorized by this chapter to be financed by such debt or appropriation are within or without the boundaries of the local government unit. Revenues derived from any project financed with bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may be pledged in whole or in part to secure payment of the bonded indebtedness incurred to finance the project. Such governing body may sell, lease, grant or otherwise supply goods and services to any other local government unit which is a party to the agreement or the administrative body or legal entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 10; Laws, 2017, ch. 337, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 57-64-13.
Joint exercise of power and authority by local governments.

Any power, authority or responsibility exercised or capable of being exercised by a local government unit of this state may be exercised and carried out jointly with any other local government unit of this state or with a foreign governmental unit of another state, any state board, agency or commission and any public agency of the United States, to the extent that the laws of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment.

No such power, authority and responsibility may be exercised under the provisions of this chapter which will have the effect of abolishing any office which is held by a person elected by the citizenry.

No agreement made under this chapter shall be entered into by any local government unit without the approval by resolution on the minutes of the governing body of that local government unit.

Any joint undertaking entered into under this chapter shall be evidenced by written contractual agreements for joint or cooperative action to provide services and facilities pursuant to the provisions of this chapter which agreements shall be approved by the MDA. Appropriate action by ordinance, resolution or otherwise pursuant to the law controlling the participating local government units or agencies shall be necessary before any such agreement shall be in force.

An alliance created pursuant to this chapter may take any action with respect to a project that any local government unit member may take. If one (1) member of the alliance shall have authority to undertake a particular project or pursue a particular action with respect to such project, then the alliance shall have identical authority so to do. No local government unit shall be precluded from joining an alliance, and it shall not be the basis for denying an application for a certificate of convenience and necessity by the MDA, solely because the alliance may have power to take actions that the local government unit acting alone could not take.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-15.
Powers with regard to issuance of bonds.

The local government unit shall be the issuer of any debt incurred hereunder and the proceeds of such debt shall be made available to the alliance in order to provide funds to defray the costs of a project.

The local government unit shall have power in the issuance of its bonds to:

Covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal.

Redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof.

Covenant to charge rates, fees and charges sufficient to meet operating and maintenance expenses, renewals and replacements, principal and debt service on bonds, creation and maintenance of any reserves required by a bond resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument and to provide for any margins or coverages over and above debt service on the bonds deemed desirable for the marketability of the bonds.

Covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived and as to the consequences of default and the remedies of bondholders.

Covenant as to the mortgage or pledge of or the grant of a security interest in any real or personal property and all or any part of the revenues from any facilities or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by the compact with any person to secure the payment of bonds, subject to such agreements with the holders of bonds as may then exist.

Covenant as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any revenue assets, monies, funds or property with respect to which the compact may have any rights or interest.

Covenant as to the purpose to which the proceeds from the sale of any bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied, and the pledge of such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds.

Covenant as to the limitations on the issuance of any additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds.

Covenant as to the rank or priority of any bonds with respect to any lien or security.

Covenant as to the procedure by which the terms of any contract with or for the benefit of the holders of bonds may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given.

Covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safekeeping thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance proceeds.

Covenant as to the vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the state, of such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the local government unit may determine.

Covenant as to the appointing and providing for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents or other fiduciaries within or outside the state.

Make all other covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, including providing a debt service reserve fund, bond insurance and credit enhancement, or in the absolute discretion of the local government unit make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the intention hereof to give the local government unit power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the provisions for security thereof which are not inconsistent with the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, as any purchaser of the bonds of the local government unit may reasonably require.

Before the local government unit may issue any bonds to finance any debt relating to a proposed project under this chapter, the governing authority of the local government unit shall advertise, in addition to any other publication required by law, its intention to issue the bonds. The intention to issue bonds shall include (a) the amount of bonds proposed to be issued; (b) the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, including a specific description of the proposed project for which the proceeds of the bonds may be used and extended; and (c) the date upon which the governing authority proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Such intention to issue bonds shall be published once in at least one (1) newspaper published in such local government unit. The publication of such intention to issue bonds shall be made not less than thirty (30) days before the date upon which the governing authority proposes to direct the issuance of the bonds. If no newspaper be published in such local government unit, then such notice shall be given by publishing the intention to issue bonds for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such local government unit and, in addition, by posting a copy of such intention to issue bonds for at least thirty (30) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such local government unit. The newspaper publication shall be a notice that shall not be less than forty (40) square inches in size and surrounded by a one-fourth-inch solid black border. The notice shall be headlined “NOTICE OF BOND ISSUE” and the headline shall be no smaller than thirty (30) point type. The remainder of the notice shall be no smaller than ten (10) point type. The notice shall not be placed in any portion of the newspaper where legal notices and classified advertisements appear.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-17.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The MDA is hereby authorized and empowered to promulgate and put into effect, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, all reasonable rules and regulations that it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of the Regional Economic Development Act. Nothing in the Regional Economic Development Act shall in any way confer to the MDA the authority to impose a sales tax or other tax of any kind.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-19.
Intergovernmental cooperation and coordination; powers with regard to certain projects.

The alliance is authorized to cooperate and coordinate with economic development commissions, authorities, districts, travel, and other similar commissions and boards, or other similar agencies of other states, the federal government, and with county, municipal, and regional economic development, travel, and other similar commissions or boards, or other agencies thereof, and other political subdivisions of this state, for the purposes of securing economic development within the State of Mississippi and other states, and to accomplish this purpose.

With regard to a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) a regional economic development alliance shall have the following powers:

[Repealed].

To negotiate the necessary relocation or rerouting of roads and highways, railroad, telephone and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, pipelines and related facilities, cellular towers and related facilities, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided due compensation is paid to the owners thereof or agreement is had with such owners regarding the payment of the cost of such relocation, and to acquire by condemnation or otherwise easements or rights-of-way for such relocation or rerouting and to convey the same to the owners of the facilities being relocated or rerouted in connection with the purposes of the project.

To negotiate the necessary relocation of graves and cemeteries and to pay all reasonable costs thereof as necessary for the project.

To lease, sell or convey any or all property acquired by the alliance or its agent under the provisions of this section to the enterprise operating the project, its affiliates, successors or assigns, and in connection therewith to warrant title to pay the costs of title search, perfection of title, title insurance and recording fees as may be required for the project.

To establish and maintain reasonable rates and charges for the use of any facility or property within the project area owned or operated by the alliance, and from time to time, to adjust such rates and to impose penalties for failure to pay such rates and charges when due as necessary for the project.

To establish land use restrictions within the lands adjacent to the project site. Within the lands identified as necessary for the project, the following land uses are prohibited:

Heavy industrial uses, where the assembly, fabrication, or processing of goods and materials using processes that ordinarily have greater than average impacts on the environment, or that ordinarily have significant impacts on the use and enjoyment of other properties in terms of noise, smoke, fumes, odors, glare, or health or safety hazards, which shall include, enameling, lacquering; foundries producing iron and steel products; industrial chemical manufacture; meat packing plants; oxygen manufacture and/or storage; pottery, porcelain and vitreous china manufacture; poultry dressing for wholesale; pressure treating of wood; stone cutting; tire recapping and retreading; resource extraction; and recycling and salvage operations.

All temporary or permanent living quarters, including, without limitation, houses, residential buildings, apartments, motels, hotels, motor lodges, mobile home parks, camping grounds, nursing homes, independent and assisted living facilities.

Schools, day care centers and hospitals.

Any of the uses set forth in this paragraph (f) which are ancillary or adjacent to an otherwise permitted use.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, these land use restrictions will not prohibit the continuation of existing uses, including rebuilding substantially in conformity with the use in existence immediately before a casualty loss. For a period of twelve (12) months from the date of adoption, the property owners within the lands identified as necessary for the project have a vested right to complete any new land use that is currently under construction.

To execute contractual agreements to warrant the project site for any and all preexisting environmental issues and to indemnify an enterprise owning a project on that site for such preexisting environmental issues.

To adopt and enforce all necessary and reasonable rules and regulations restrictions to carry out and effectuate the implementation of the project concerning mining or any other activity the occurrence of which may endanger the structure or operation of the project. These rules may be enforced within the project area and without the project area as necessary to protect the structure and operation of the project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 14; Laws, 2007, ch. 303, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 2, 2007).

§ 57-64-21.
Agreements under this chapter to include certain provisions.

Any agreement made under this chapter shall specify the following:

Its duration.

Its purpose or purposes.

The precise organization, composition, nature and powers of any separate legal or administrative entity created thereby and the specific citation of statutory authority vested in each of the local government units which is to be a party to the agreement.

The manner of financing, staffing and supplying the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget therefor; provided that the treasurer and/or disbursing officer of one (1) of the local government units shall be designated in the agreement to receive, disburse and account for all funds of the joint undertaking as a part of the duties of the officer or officers.

The permissible method or methods to be employed in operating the alliance and the project and accomplishing the partial or complete termination or amendment of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination or amendment.

The provision for administration of issuance of any bonds under this chapter by a local government unit exercising the power authorized by this chapter.

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking in the event that the agreement does not or may not establish a separate legal entity to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking.

A provision specifying the terms and conditions that would cause the alliance to be terminated.

The manner in which the costs of the project shall be shared between the local government units.

The manner in which the revenues from the project shall be shared by the local government units.

Any other necessary and proper matters.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-23.
Agreements under this chapter to be approved by certain officers; agreements to be filed.

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer, unit or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its being in force, be submitted to the state officer, unit or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by him or it as to all matters within his or its jurisdiction in the same manner and subject to the same requirements governing action of the Attorney General pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Every agreement made by a local government unit under this chapter shall, prior to and as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the Attorney General of this state who shall determine whether the agreement is in proper form and compatible with the laws of this state. The Attorney General shall approve any such agreement submitted to him hereunder unless he shall find that it does not meet the conditions set forth herein and elsewhere in the laws of this state and shall detail in writing addressed to the governing bodies of the units concerned the specific respects in which the proposed agreement fails to meet the requirements of law.

Failure to disapprove an agreement submitted hereunder within sixty (60) days of its submission shall constitute approval thereof.

Prior to its being in force, an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall be filed with the chancery clerk of each of the counties wherein a participating local government unit is located and with the Secretary of State. The chancery clerk and the Secretary of State shall preserve such agreements as public records and index and docket the same separate and apart from all other records in his office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 16; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 57-64-25.
Applicability of existing laws.

All laws in regard to purchases, auditing, depositories and expenditures in general which limit the authority of the agreeing local governing units shall also apply to any joint body created by the agreement pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-27.
Powers and authorities granted by this chapter additional and supplemental to existing powers; chapter does not authorize alliances to provide utility service other than water and sewage; chapter not a limitation on local authority to proceed with a project utilizing methods not included in this chapter.

The powers and authority granted and set forth in this chapter shall be additional and supplemental to any other powers and authority granted by law and shall not amend, repeal or supersede any other powers and authority granted by law.

Nothing in this chapter shall authorize an alliance to provide utility services, other than water and sewage, for compensation. This subsection shall not be construed to prevent a city, county or natural gas district from supplying utility service that it is authorized to supply in the service area that it is authorized to serve.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the authority of any local government unit to plan, construct, expand or maintain a project as defined in this chapter utilizing any method not included in this chapter, nor shall the authority to issue bonds to finance such projects or oversight of the project be construed to be transferred to the MDA.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-64-29.
Authority of member of regional economic development alliance to negotiate purchase option for real property; preliminary engineering, environmental and related studies; costs.

A local government unit that is a member of a regional economic development alliance created under the Regional Economic Development Act is authorized to negotiate a purchase option for real property to be used for the purposes of the alliance. A local government unit may pay all costs incurred for the acquisition of such an option regardless of whether the local government unit exercises the option at a later date. As a part of any such option, a local government unit may negotiate the right to enter upon the real property before the purchase for the purpose of conducting any preliminary engineering, environmental and related surveys or studies necessary to effectuate the option. A local government unit may pay all costs incurred for such surveys or studies regardless of whether the local government unit exercises the option at a later date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 464, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 337, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 13, 2017).

§ 57-64-31.
Eminent domain.

The board of supervisors of any county that is a member of a regional economic development alliance created under the Regional Economic Development Act may exercise the power of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring land, property and/or rights-of-way for a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(i) or any facility related to the project as defined in Section 57-75-5(d), or both. The board of supervisors of such a county shall not exercise the authority granted under this section without first receiving a binding commitment providing that such a project will be located in a county that is a member of the regional economic development alliance. The board of supervisors of such a county shall not exercise the power of eminent domain under this section after July 1, 2006.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 378, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 57-64-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 481, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 2004).

[Laws, 2002, ch. 464, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2002.)]